Missouri, session 2026, HB2669.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 550.320, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 550.320, to read as follows:
550.320. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of corrections of the state of Missouri;
(2) "Jail reimbursement", a daily per diem paid by the state for the reimbursement of
time spent in custody.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, whenever any person is
sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a correctional center, the department shall reimburse
the county or city not within a county for the days the person spent in custody at a per diem
cost, subject to appropriation, but not to exceed [thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents] forty
dollars per day per offender. The jail reimbursement shall be subject to review and approval
of the department. The state shall pay the costs when:
(1) A person is sentenced to a term of imprisonment as authorized by chapter 558;
(2) A person is sentenced pursuant to section 559.115;
(3) A person has his or her probation or parole revoked because the offender has, or
allegedly has, violated any condition of the offender's probation or parole, and such probation
or parole is a consequence of a violation of the law, or the offender is a fugitive from the state
or otherwise held at the request of the department regardless of whether or not a warrant has
been issued; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2669 2
(4) A person has a period of detention imposed pursuant to section 559.026.
3. When the final determination of any criminal prosecution shall be such as to render
the state liable for costs under existing laws, it shall be the duty of the office of the sheriff or
the chief executive officer of the city not within a county to certify the total number of days
any offender who was a party in such case remained in the jail and submit the total number of
days spent in custody to the department. The office of the sheriff or chief executive officer of
the city not within a county may submit claims to the department, no later than two years
from the date the claim became eligible for reimbursement.
4. The department shall determine if the expenses are eligible pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and remit any payment to the county or city not within a county
when the expenses are determined to be eligible. The department shall establish, by rule, the
process for submission of claims. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2025,
shall be invalid and void.
✔